District of Columbia statutes.
11-2103

Services as clerk.

With respect to the Probate Division of the Superior Court, the Register of Wills shall perform such duties as clerk as the chief judge of the Superior Court may assign.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 516, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
1981 Ed., § 11-2103.
1973 Ed., § 11-2103.